Utah statutes.
63A-14-708.   Attorney fees and costs.

(1)  A complainant:

(a)  may, but is not required to, retain legal representation during the complaint review process; and

(b)  is responsible for payment of the complainant's attorney fees and costs incurred.

(2)  A respondent:

(a)  may, but is not required to, retain legal representation during the complaint review process; and

(b)  is responsible for payment of the respondent's attorney fees and costs incurred.

(3)  An attorney who participates in a hearing before the commission shall comply with:

(a)  the Rules of Professional Conduct established by the Utah Supreme Court;

(b)  the procedures and requirements of this chapter; and

(c)  the directions of the chair and the commission.

(4)  A violation of Subsection (3) may constitute:

(a)  contempt of the commission under Section 63A-14-705; or

(b)  a violation of the Rules of Professional Conduct, subject to enforcement by the Utah State Bar.



Enacted by Chapter 426, 2013 General Session

